District of Columbia statutes.
9-634

Criteria for review.

(a)

It is the policy of the District to approve block parties.

(b)

An application for a block party shall not be denied unless:

(1)

It fails to meet the requirements of this chapter;

(2)

The event would create a significant public safety concern;

(3)

The event would create a significant traffic problem; or

(4)

There is substantial neighborhood opposition to the block party.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-190, § 5, 59 DCR 10163